West Virginia, session 2025, SB662.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 17. HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION §16B-17-21. Racial discrimination based on certain hair textures and hairstyles; definitions. (a) For the purposes of this article, discrimination based on race includes, but is not limited to, discrimination based on hair textures and protective hairstyles historically associated with a particular race.(b) The term "protective hairstyles" includes, but is not limited to, hairstyles such as braids, locks, and twists.